inc/flattened/createYaml/yaml_output/VAI_IND_ii.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nimadaabii
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg: gimadaabii
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl: nimadaabiimin
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl: gimadaabiimin
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl: gimadaabiim
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx: madaabii
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx: madaabiiwag
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv: madaabiiwan
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv: madaabiiwa'
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X: madaabiim
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg: [nimadaabiisiin,nimadaabiisii]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg: [gimadaabiisiin,gimadaabiisii]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl: nimadaabiisiimin
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl: gimadaabiisiimin
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl: gimadaabiisiim
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx: [madaabiisiin,madaabiisii]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx: madaabiisiiwag
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv: madaabiisiiwan
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv: [madaabiisiiwan,madaabiisiiwa']
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X: madaabiisiim
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg: nimadaabiinaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg: gimadaabiinaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl: nimadaabiiminaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl: gimadaabiiminaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl: gimadaabiimwaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx: madaabiiban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx: [madaabiibaniig,madaabiibaneg]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv: [madaabiibaniin,madaabiibanen]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv: [madaabiibaniin,madaabiibanen]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X: madaabiimwaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg: nimadaabiisiinaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg: gimadaabiisiinaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl: nimadaabiisiiminaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl: gimadaabiisiiminaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl: gimadaabiisiimwaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx: madaabiisiiban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx: [madaabiisiibaniig,madaabiisiibaneg]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv: [madaabiisiibaniin,madaabiisiibanen]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv: [madaabiisiibaniin,madaabiisiibanen]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X: madaabiisiimwaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg: nimadaabiinaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg: gimadaabiinaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl: nimadaabiiminaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl: gimadaabiiminaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl: gimadaabiimwaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx: madaabiidog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx: madaabiidogenag
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv: madaabiidogenan
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv: [madaabiidogenan,madaabiidogena']
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X: madaabiimwaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg: nimadaabiisiinaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg: gimadaabiisiinaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl: nimadaabiisiiminaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl: gimadaabiisiiminaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl: gimadaabiisiimwaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx: madaabiisiidog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx: madaabiisiidogenag
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv: madaabiisiidogenan
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv: [madaabiisiidogenan,madaabiisiidogena']
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X: madaabiisiimwaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: madaabiigoban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: madaabiigwaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: madaabiinigoban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: madaabiisiigoban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: madaabiisiigwaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: madaabiisiinigoban
